Alaska statutes. Title 11. Criminal Law.
Article 2. Vulnerable Adults.

Sec. 11.51.200.
Endangering the welfare of a vulnerable adult in the first degree.

A person commits the crime of endangering the welfare of a vulnerable adult in the first degree if the person

intentionally abandons a vulnerable adult in any place under circumstances creating a substantial risk of physical injury to the vulnerable adult and the vulnerable adult is in the person’s care

by contract or authority of law; or

in a facility or program that is required by law to be licensed by the state; or

violates AS

11.51.210

and, as a result of the violation, the vulnerable adult suffers serious physical injury.

Endangering the welfare of a vulnerable adult in the first degree is a class C felony.

History.

(§ 3 ch 61 SLA 1996)

Cross references. —

For punishment of class C felonies, see AS

12.55.125(e)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 11.51.210.
Endangering the welfare of a vulnerable adult in the second degree.

A person commits the crime of endangering the welfare of a vulnerable adult in the second degree if the person fails without lawful excuse to provide support for the vulnerable adult and the vulnerable adult is in the person’s care

by contract or authority of law; or

in a facility or program that is required by law to be licensed by the state.

As used in this section, “support” includes necessary food, care, clothing, shelter, and medical attention. There is no failure to provide medical attention to a vulnerable adult if the vulnerable adult is provided treatment solely by spiritual means through prayer in accordance with the tenets and practices of a recognized church or religious denomination of which the vulnerable adult is a member or adherent, provided the vulnerable adult consents to the treatment through spiritual means only, and the treatment is administered by an accredited practitioner of the church or denomination.

Endangering the welfare of a vulnerable adult in the second degree is a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 3 ch 61 SLA 1996)

Cross references. —

For punishment of class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 11.51.220.
Definition of vulnerable adult.

In AS

11.51.200

—

11.51.210

, “vulnerable adult” has the meaning given in AS

47.24.900

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 61 SLA 1996)